Hawaii statutes.
[§321-214] Enforcement; rules. Any
person under twenty-one years of age who violates section 321-212 shall be
fined $10 for the first offense. Any subsequent offense shall subject the
violator to a fine of $50, no part of which shall be suspended, or the person
shall be required to perform not less than forty-eight hours nor more than
seventy-two hours of community service during hours when the person is not
employed and is not attending school. [L 2015, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next